test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VINIT_aagim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - VINIT - aagim :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     aagim: aagim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+aagim: nidaagim
     2+aagim: gidaagim
     3+aagim: odaagim
     X+aagim: idaagim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     aagim+Con: aagimenh
     aagim+Dim: aagimens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     aagim+Pej: aagimish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     aagim+Pret: aagimiban
     aagim+VocPl: [aagimidig, aagimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     aagim+Loc: aagiming
     aagim+Obv: aagiman
     aagim+Pl: aagimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+aagim+Con: nidaagimenh
     1+aagim+Dim: nidaagimens
     2+aagim+Con: gidaagimenh
     2+aagim+Dim: gidaagimens
     3+aagim+Con: odaagimenh
     3+aagim+Dim: odaagimens
     X+aagim+Con: idaagimenh
     X+aagim+Dim: idaagimens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+aagim+Pos: nidaagimim
     2+aagim+Pos: gidaagimim
     3+aagim+Pos: odaagimim
     X+aagim+Pos: idaagimim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+aagim+Pej: nidaagimish
     2+aagim+Pej: gidaagimish
     3+aagim+Pej: odaagimish
     X+aagim+Pej: idaagimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+aagim+1Pl: nidaagiminaan
     2+aagim+21: gidaagiminaan
     2+aagim+2Pl: gidaagimiwaa
     3+aagim+3Obv: odaagimini
     3+aagim+3Pl: odaagimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+aagim+Pret: nidaagimiban
     1+aagim+VocPl: [nidaagimidig, nidaagimidog]
     2+aagim+Pret: gidaagimiban
     2+aagim+VocPl: [gidaagimidig, gidaagimidog]
     3+aagim+Pret: odaagimiban
     3+aagim+VocPl: [odaagimidig, odaagimidog]
     X+aagim+Pret: idaagimiban
     X+aagim+VocPl: [idaagimidig, idaagimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+aagim+Loc: nidaagiming
     1+aagim+Obv: nidaagiman
     1+aagim+Pl: nidaagimag
     2+aagim+Loc: gidaagiming
     2+aagim+Obv: gidaagiman
     2+aagim+Pl: gidaagimag
     3+aagim+Loc: odaagiming
     3+aagim+Obv: odaagiman
     3+aagim+Pl: odaagimag
     X+aagim+Loc: idaagiming
     X+aagim+Obv: idaagiman
     X+aagim+Pl: idaagimag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     aagim+Con+Pej: aagimenyish
     aagim+Dim+Pej: aagimensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     aagim+Con+Pret: aagimenyiban
     aagim+Con+VocPl: [aagimenyidig, aagimenyidog]
     aagim+Dim+Pret: aagimensiban
     aagim+Dim+VocPl: [aagimensidig, aagimensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     aagim+Con+Loc: aagimenying
     aagim+Con+Obv: aagimenyin
     aagim+Con+Pl: aagimenyig
     aagim+Dim+Loc: aagimensing
     aagim+Dim+Obv: aagimensan
     aagim+Dim+Pl: aagimensag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     aagim+Pej+Pret: aagimishiban
     aagim+Pej+VocPl: [aagimishidig, aagimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     aagim+Pej+Loc: aagimishing
     aagim+Pej+Obv: aagimishan
     aagim+Pej+Pl: aagimishag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     aagim+Pret+Loc: aagimibaniing
     aagim+Pret+Obv: aagimibaniin
     aagim+Pret+Pl: aagimibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+aagim+Con+Pos: nidaagimenyim
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos: nidaagimensim
     2+aagim+Con+Pos: gidaagimenyim
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos: gidaagimensim
     3+aagim+Con+Pos: odaagimenyim
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos: odaagimensim
     X+aagim+Con+Pos: idaagimenyim
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos: idaagimensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+aagim+Con+Pej: nidaagimenyish
     1+aagim+Dim+Pej: nidaagimensish
     2+aagim+Con+Pej: gidaagimenyish
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej: gidaagimensish
     3+aagim+Con+Pej: odaagimenyish
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej: odaagimensish
     X+aagim+Con+Pej: idaagimenyish
     X+aagim+Dim+Pej: idaagimensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+aagim+Con+1Pl: nidaagimenyinaan
     1+aagim+Dim+1Pl: nidaagimensinaan
     2+aagim+Con+21: gidaagimenyinaan
     2+aagim+Con+2Pl: gidaagimenyiwaa
     2+aagim+Dim+21: gidaagimensinaan
     2+aagim+Dim+2Pl: gidaagimensiwaa
     3+aagim+Con+3Obv: odaagimenyini
     3+aagim+Con+3Pl: odaagimenyiwaa
     3+aagim+Dim+3Obv: odaagimensini
     3+aagim+Dim+3Pl: odaagimensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+aagim+Con+Pret: nidaagimenyiban
     1+aagim+Con+VocPl: [nidaagimenyidig, nidaagimenyidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+Pret: nidaagimensiban
     1+aagim+Dim+VocPl: [nidaagimensidig, nidaagimensidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pret: gidaagimenyiban
     2+aagim+Con+VocPl: [gidaagimenyidig, gidaagimenyidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pret: gidaagimensiban
     2+aagim+Dim+VocPl: [gidaagimensidig, gidaagimensidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pret: odaagimenyiban
     3+aagim+Con+VocPl: [odaagimenyidig, odaagimenyidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pret: odaagimensiban
     3+aagim+Dim+VocPl: [odaagimensidig, odaagimensidog]
     X+aagim+Con+Pret: idaagimenyiban
     X+aagim+Con+VocPl: [idaagimenyidig, idaagimenyidog]
     X+aagim+Dim+Pret: idaagimensiban
     X+aagim+Dim+VocPl: [idaagimensidig, idaagimensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+aagim+Con+Loc: nidaagimenying
     1+aagim+Con+Obv: nidaagimenyin
     1+aagim+Con+Pl: nidaagimenyig
     1+aagim+Dim+Loc: nidaagimensing
     1+aagim+Dim+Obv: nidaagimensan
     1+aagim+Dim+Pl: nidaagimensag
     2+aagim+Con+Loc: gidaagimenying
     2+aagim+Con+Obv: gidaagimenyin
     2+aagim+Con+Pl: gidaagimenyig
     2+aagim+Dim+Loc: gidaagimensing
     2+aagim+Dim+Obv: gidaagimensan
     2+aagim+Dim+Pl: gidaagimensag
     3+aagim+Con+Loc: odaagimenying
     3+aagim+Con+Obv: odaagimenyin
     3+aagim+Con+Pl: odaagimenyig
     3+aagim+Dim+Loc: odaagimensing
     3+aagim+Dim+Obv: odaagimensan
     3+aagim+Dim+Pl: odaagimensag
     X+aagim+Con+Loc: idaagimenying
     X+aagim+Con+Obv: idaagimenyin
     X+aagim+Con+Pl: idaagimenyig
     X+aagim+Dim+Loc: idaagimensing
     X+aagim+Dim+Obv: idaagimensan
     X+aagim+Dim+Pl: idaagimensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej: nidaagimimish
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej: gidaagimimish
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej: odaagimimish
     X+aagim+Pos+Pej: idaagimimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+aagim+Pos+1Pl: nidaagimiminaan
     2+aagim+Pos+21: gidaagimiminaan
     2+aagim+Pos+2Pl: gidaagimimiwaa
     3+aagim+Pos+3Obv: odaagimimini
     3+aagim+Pos+3Pl: odaagimimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+aagim+Pos+Pret: nidaagimimiban
     1+aagim+Pos+VocPl: [nidaagimimidig, nidaagimimidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pret: gidaagimimiban
     2+aagim+Pos+VocPl: [gidaagimimidig, gidaagimimidog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pret: odaagimimiban
     3+aagim+Pos+VocPl: [odaagimimidig, odaagimimidog]
     X+aagim+Pos+Pret: idaagimimiban
     X+aagim+Pos+VocPl: [idaagimimidig, idaagimimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+aagim+Pos+Loc: nidaagimiming
     1+aagim+Pos+Obv: nidaagimiman
     1+aagim+Pos+Pl: nidaagimimag
     2+aagim+Pos+Loc: gidaagimiming
     2+aagim+Pos+Obv: gidaagimiman
     2+aagim+Pos+Pl: gidaagimimag
     3+aagim+Pos+Loc: odaagimiming
     3+aagim+Pos+Obv: odaagimiman
     3+aagim+Pos+Pl: odaagimimag
     X+aagim+Pos+Loc: idaagimiming
     X+aagim+Pos+Obv: idaagimiman
     X+aagim+Pos+Pl: idaagimimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+aagim+Pej+1Pl: nidaagimishinaan
     2+aagim+Pej+21: gidaagimishinaan
     2+aagim+Pej+2Pl: gidaagimishiwaa
     3+aagim+Pej+3Obv: odaagimishini
     3+aagim+Pej+3Pl: odaagimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+aagim+Pej+Pret: nidaagimishiban
     1+aagim+Pej+VocPl: [nidaagimishidig, nidaagimishidog]
     2+aagim+Pej+Pret: gidaagimishiban
     2+aagim+Pej+VocPl: [gidaagimishidig, gidaagimishidog]
     3+aagim+Pej+Pret: odaagimishiban
     3+aagim+Pej+VocPl: [odaagimishidig, odaagimishidog]
     X+aagim+Pej+Pret: idaagimishiban
     X+aagim+Pej+VocPl: [idaagimishidig, idaagimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+aagim+Pej+Loc: nidaagimishing
     1+aagim+Pej+Obv: nidaagimishan
     1+aagim+Pej+Pl: nidaagimishag
     2+aagim+Pej+Loc: gidaagimishing
     2+aagim+Pej+Obv: gidaagimishan
     2+aagim+Pej+Pl: gidaagimishag
     3+aagim+Pej+Loc: odaagimishing
     3+aagim+Pej+Obv: odaagimishan
     3+aagim+Pej+Pl: odaagimishag
     X+aagim+Pej+Loc: idaagimishing
     X+aagim+Pej+Obv: idaagimishan
     X+aagim+Pej+Pl: idaagimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+aagim+1Pl+Pret: nidaagiminaaniban
     1+aagim+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaagiminaanidig, nidaagiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+21+Pret: gidaagiminaaniban
     2+aagim+21+VocPl: [gidaagiminaanidig, gidaagiminaanidog]
     2+aagim+2Pl+Pret: gidaagimiwaaban
     2+aagim+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaagimiwaadig, gidaagimiwaadog]
     3+aagim+3Obv+Pret: odaagiminiiban
     3+aagim+3Obv+VocPl: [odaagiminiidig, odaagiminiidog]
     3+aagim+3Pl+Pret: odaagimiwaaban
     3+aagim+3Pl+VocPl: [odaagimiwaadig, odaagimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+aagim+1Pl+Loc: nidaagiminaaning
     1+aagim+1Pl+Obv: nidaagiminaanin
     1+aagim+1Pl+Pl: nidaagiminaanig
     2+aagim+21+Loc: gidaagiminaaning
     2+aagim+21+Obv: gidaagiminaanin
     2+aagim+21+Pl: gidaagiminaanig
     2+aagim+2Pl+Loc: gidaagimiwaang
     2+aagim+2Pl+Obv: gidaagimiwaan
     2+aagim+2Pl+Pl: gidaagimiwaag
     3+aagim+3Obv+Loc: odaagiminiing
     3+aagim+3Obv+Obv: odaagiminiin
     3+aagim+3Obv+Pl: odaagiminiig
     3+aagim+3Pl+Loc: odaagimiwaang
     3+aagim+3Pl+Obv: odaagimiwaan
     3+aagim+3Pl+Pl: odaagimiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Pret+Loc: nidaagimibaniing
     1+aagim+Pret+Obv: nidaagimibaniin
     1+aagim+Pret+Pl: nidaagimibaniig
     2+aagim+Pret+Loc: gidaagimibaniing
     2+aagim+Pret+Obv: gidaagimibaniin
     2+aagim+Pret+Pl: gidaagimibaniig
     3+aagim+Pret+Loc: odaagimibaniing
     3+aagim+Pret+Obv: odaagimibaniin
     3+aagim+Pret+Pl: odaagimibaniig
     X+aagim+Pret+Loc: idaagimibaniing
     X+aagim+Pret+Obv: idaagimibaniin
     X+aagim+Pret+Pl: idaagimibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     aagim+Con+Pej+Pret: aagimenyishiban
     aagim+Con+Pej+VocPl: [aagimenyishidig, aagimenyishidog]
     aagim+Dim+Pej+Pret: aagimensishiban
     aagim+Dim+Pej+VocPl: [aagimensishidig, aagimensishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     aagim+Con+Pej+Loc: aagimenyishing
     aagim+Con+Pej+Obv: aagimenyishan
     aagim+Con+Pej+Pl: aagimenyishag
     aagim+Dim+Pej+Loc: aagimensishing
     aagim+Dim+Pej+Obv: aagimensishan
     aagim+Dim+Pej+Pl: aagimensishag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     aagim+Con+Pret+Loc: aagimenyibaniing
     aagim+Con+Pret+Obv: aagimenyibaniin
     aagim+Con+Pret+Pl: aagimenyibaniig
     aagim+Dim+Pret+Loc: aagimensibaniing
     aagim+Dim+Pret+Obv: aagimensibaniin
     aagim+Dim+Pret+Pl: aagimensibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     aagim+Pej+Pret+Loc: aagimishibaniing
     aagim+Pej+Pret+Obv: aagimishibaniin
     aagim+Pej+Pret+Pl: aagimishibaniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej: nidaagimenyimish
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej: nidaagimensimish
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej: gidaagimenyimish
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej: gidaagimensimish
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej: odaagimenyimish
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej: odaagimensimish
     X+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej: idaagimenyimish
     X+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej: idaagimensimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+1Pl: nidaagimenyiminaan
